Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.070 and 2024 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140. Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:(1) A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces and green spaces, urban and community forests within the urban growth area, general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies. The land use element must give special consideration to achieving environmental justice in its goals and policies, including efforts to avoid creating or worsening environmental health disparities. Wherever possible, the land use element should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote physical activity and reduce per capita vehicle miles traveled within the jurisdiction, but without increasing greenhouse gas emissions elsewhere in the state. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage, flooding, and stormwater runoff in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound. The land use element must reduce and mitigate the risk to lives and property posed by wildfires by using land use planning tools, which may include, but are not limited to, adoption of portions or all of the wildland urban interface code developed by the international code council or developing building and maintenance standards consistent with the firewise USA program or similar program designed to reduce wildfire risk, reducing wildfire risks to residential development in high risk areas and the wildland urban interface area, separating human development from wildfire prone landscapes, and protecting existing residential development and infrastructure through community wildfire preparedness and fire adaptation measures.(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods that:(a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth, as provided by the department of commerce, including:(i) Units for moderate, low, very low, and extremely low-income households; and(ii) Emergency housing, emergency shelters, and permanent supportive housing;(b) Includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing, including single-family residences, and within an urban growth area boundary, moderate density housing options including, but not limited to, duplexes, triplexes, and townhomes;(c) Identifies sufficient capacity of land for housing including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing, housing for moderate, low, very low, and extremely low-income households, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, group homes, foster care facilities, emergency housing, emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, and within an urban growth area boundary, consideration of duplexes, triplexes, and townhomes;(d) Identifies infrastructure barriers that may constrain the feasibility of housing development, including public infrastructure and frontage improvement requirements that disproportionately affect infill or middle housing;(e) Makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all economic segments of the community, including:(i) Incorporating consideration for low, very low, extremely low, and moderate-income households;(ii) Documenting programs and actions needed to achieve housing availability including gaps in local funding, barriers such as development regulations, and other limitations;(iii) Consideration of housing locations in relation to employment location; and(iv) Consideration of the role of accessory dwelling units in meeting housing needs;(((e)))(f) Identifies local policies and regulations that result in racially disparate impacts, displacement, and exclusion in housing, including:(i) Zoning that may have a discriminatory effect;(ii) Disinvestment; and(iii) Infrastructure availability;(((f)))(g) Identifies and implements policies and regulations to address and begin to undo racially disparate impacts, displacement, and exclusion in housing caused by local policies, plans, and actions;(((g)))(h) Identifies areas that may be at higher risk of displacement from market forces that occur with changes to zoning development regulations and capital investments; and(((h)))(i) Establishes antidisplacement policies, with consideration given to the preservation of historical and cultural communities as well as investments in low, very low, extremely low, and moderate-income housing; equitable development initiatives; inclusionary zoning; community planning requirements; tenant protections; land disposition policies; and consideration of land that may be used for affordable housing.In counties and cities subject to the review and evaluation requirements of RCW 36.70A.215, any revision to the housing element shall include consideration of prior review and evaluation reports and any reasonable measures identified. The housing element should link jurisdictional goals with overall county goals to ensure that the housing element goals are met.The adoption of ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, and other nonproject actions taken by a city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 that increase housing capacity, increase housing affordability, and mitigate displacement as required under this subsection (2) and that apply outside of critical areas are not subject to administrative or judicial appeal under chapter 43.21C RCW unless the adoption of such ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, or other nonproject actions has a probable significant adverse impact on fish habitat.(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities, including green infrastructure, showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan element.The county or city shall identify all public entities that own capital facilities and endeavor in good faith to work with other public entities, such as special purpose districts, to gather and include within its capital facilities element the information required by this subsection. If, after a good faith effort, the county or city is unable to gather the information required by this subsection from the other public entities, the failure to include such information in its capital facilities element cannot be grounds for a finding of noncompliance or invalidity under chapter 228, Laws of 2023. A good faith effort must, at a minimum, include consulting the public entity's capital facility or system plans and emailing and calling the staff of the public entity.(4)(a) A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities including, but not limited to, electrical, telecommunications, and natural gas systems.(b) The county or city shall identify all public entities that own utility systems and endeavor in good faith to work with other public entities, such as special purpose districts, to gather and include within its utilities element the information required in (a) of this subsection. However, if, after a good faith effort, the county or city is unable to gather the information required in (a) of this subsection from the other public entities, the failure to include such information in the utilities element shall not be grounds for a finding of noncompliance or invalidity under chapter 228, Laws of 2023. A good faith effort must, at a minimum, include consulting the public entity's capital facility or system plans, and emailing and calling the staff of the public entity.(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural economic advancement, densities, and uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established by the county, by:(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and groundwater resources; and(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited area as follows:(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use area are subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but are not subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection.(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population.(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size, scale, use, or intensity may be permitted subject to confirmation from all existing providers of public facilities and public services of sufficient capacity of existing public facilities and public services to serve any new or additional demand from the new development or redevelopment. Development and redevelopment may include changes in use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5) and is consistent with the local character. Any commercial development or redevelopment within a mixed-use area must be principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and must meet the following requirements:(I) Any included retail or food service space must not exceed the footprint of previously occupied space or 5,000 square feet, whichever is greater, for the same or similar use, unless the retail space is for an essential rural retail service and the designated limited area is located at least 10 miles from an existing urban growth area, then the retail space must not exceed the footprint of the previously occupied space or 10,000 square feet, whichever is greater; and(II) Any included retail or food service space must not exceed 2,500 square feet for a new use, unless the new retail space is for an essential rural retail service and the designated limited area is located at least 10 miles from an existing urban growth area, then the new retail space must not exceed 10,000 square feet;For the purposes of this subsection (5)(d), "essential rural retail services" means services including grocery, pharmacy, hardware, automotive parts, and similar uses that sell or provide products necessary for health and safety, such as food, medication, sanitation supplies, and products to maintain habitability and mobility;(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the rural character of the area as defined by the local government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((35))). Rural counties may also allow new small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to the rural character of the area as defined by the local government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((35))). Public services and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such existing areas shall not extend beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area, thereby allowing a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B) physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;(v) For purposes of this subsection (5)(d), an existing area or existing use is one that was in existence:(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.(a) The transportation element shall include the following subelements:(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;(ii) Estimated multimodal level of service impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including transit alignments, active transportation facilities, and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and travel levels to inform future planning. This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or county's jurisdictional boundaries;(B) Multimodal level of service standards for all locally owned arterials, locally and regionally operated transit routes that serve urban growth areas, state-owned or operated transit routes that serve urban areas if the department of transportation has prepared such standards, and active transportation facilities to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system and success in helping to achieve the goals of this chapter consistent with environmental justice. These standards should be regionally coordinated;(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, multimodal level of service standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting multimodal level of service standards for state highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road, active transportation, or transit program and the office of financial management's ten-year investment program. The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance transportation facilities or services that are below an established multimodal level of service standard;(E) Forecasts of multimodal transportation demand and needs within cities and urban growth areas, and forecasts of multimodal transportation demand and needs outside of cities and urban growth areas, for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to inform the development of a transportation element that balances transportation system safety and convenience to accommodate all users of the transportation system to safely, reliably, and efficiently provide access and mobility to people and goods. Priority must be given to inclusion of transportation facilities and services providing the greatest multimodal safety benefit to each category of roadway users for the context and speed of the facility;(F) Identification of state and local system needs to equitably meet current and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW. Local system needs should reflect the regional transportation system and local goals, and strive to equitably implement the multimodal network;(G) A transition plan for transportation as required in Title II of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (ADA). As a necessary step to a program access plan to provide accessibility under the ADA, state and local government, public entities, and public agencies are required to perform self-evaluations of their current facilities, relative to accessibility requirements of the ADA. The agencies are then required to develop a program access plan, which can be called a transition plan, to address any deficiencies. The plan is intended to achieve the following:(I) Identify physical obstacles that limit the accessibility of facilities to individuals with disabilities;(II) Describe the methods to be used to make the facilities accessible;(III) Provide a schedule for making the access modifications; and(IV) Identify the public officials responsible for implementation of the transition plan;(iv) Finance, including:(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the ten-year investment program developed by the office of financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting the identified needs of the transportation system, including state transportation facilities, a discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service standards will be met;(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;(vi) Demand-management strategies;(vii) Active transportation component to include collaborative efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for active transportation facilities and corridors that address and encourage enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of service on a locally owned or locally or regionally operated transportation facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may include active transportation facility improvements, increased or enhanced public transportation service, ride-sharing programs, demand management, and other transportation systems management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6), "concurrent with the development" means that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six years. If the collection of impact fees is delayed under RCW 82.02.050(3), the six-year period required by this subsection (6)(b) must begin after full payment of all impact fees is due to the county or city. A development proposal may not be denied for causing the level of service on a locally owned or locally or regionally operated transportation facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan where such impacts could be adequately mitigated through active transportation facility improvements, increased or enhanced public transportation service, ride-sharing programs, demand management, or other transportation systems management strategies funded by the development.(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6), the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.(d) Counties and cities shall evaluate whether local street, frontage, and right-of-way standards are consistent with adopted land use and housing goals, including infill development and missing middle housing. Such standards should allow for context-sensitive design that considers existing conditions, anticipated traffic volumes, and surrounding development patterns, and should avoid unnecessary infrastructure requirements that materially constrain housing feasibility on infill or redevelopment sites.(7) An economic development element establishing local goals, policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality and a high quality of life. A city that has chosen to be a residential community is exempt from the economic development element requirement of this subsection.(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a) Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period; (b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; (c) an evaluation of tree canopy coverage within the urban growth area; and (d) an evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.(9)(a) A climate change and resiliency element that is designed to result in reductions in overall greenhouse gas emissions and that must enhance resiliency to and avoid the adverse impacts of climate change, which must include efforts to reduce localized greenhouse gas emissions and avoid creating or worsening localized climate impacts to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities.(b) The climate change and resiliency element shall include the following subelements:(i) A greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement;(ii) A resiliency subelement.(c) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement of the climate change and resiliency element is mandatory for the jurisdictions specified in RCW 36.70A.095 and is encouraged for all other jurisdictions, including those planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and those planning under chapter 36.70 RCW. The resiliency subelement of the climate change and resiliency element is mandatory for all jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and is encouraged for those jurisdictions planning under chapter 36.70 RCW.(d)(i) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement of the comprehensive plan, and its related development regulations, must identify the actions the jurisdiction will take during the planning cycle consistent with the guidelines published by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120 that will:(A) Result in reductions in overall greenhouse gas emissions generated by transportation and land use within the jurisdiction but without increasing greenhouse gas emissions elsewhere in the state;(B) Result in reductions in per capita vehicle miles traveled within the jurisdiction but without increasing greenhouse gas emissions elsewhere in the state; and(C) Prioritize reductions that benefit overburdened communities in order to maximize the cobenefits of reduced air pollution and environmental justice.(ii) Actions not specifically identified in the guidelines developed by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120 may be considered consistent with these guidelines only if:(A) They are projected to achieve greenhouse gas emissions reductions or per capita vehicle miles traveled reductions equivalent to what would be required of the jurisdiction under the guidelines adopted by the department; and(B) They are supported by scientifically credible projections and scenarios that indicate their adoption is likely to result in reductions of greenhouse gas emissions or per capita vehicle miles traveled.(iii) A jurisdiction may not restrict population growth or limit population allocation in order to achieve the requirements set forth in this subsection (9)(d).(e)(i) The resiliency subelement must equitably enhance resiliency to, and avoid or substantially reduce the adverse impacts of, climate change in human communities and ecological systems through goals, policies, and programs consistent with the best available science and scientifically credible climate projections and impact scenarios that moderate or avoid harm, enhance the resiliency of natural and human systems, and enhance beneficial opportunities. The resiliency subelement must prioritize actions that benefit overburdened communities that will disproportionately suffer from compounding environmental impacts and will be most impacted by natural hazards due to climate change. Specific goals, policies, and programs of the resiliency subelement must include, but are not limited to, those designed to:(A) Identify, protect, and enhance natural areas to foster resiliency to climate impacts, as well as areas of vital habitat for safe passage and species migration;(B) Identify, protect, and enhance community resiliency to climate change impacts, including social, economic, and built environment factors, that support adaptation to climate impacts consistent with environmental justice; and(C) Address natural hazards created or aggravated by climate change, including sea level rise, landslides, flooding, drought, heat, smoke, wildfire, and other effects of changes to temperature and precipitation patterns.(ii) A natural hazard mitigation plan or similar plan that is guided by RCW 36.70A.020(14), that prioritizes actions that benefit overburdened communities, and that complies with the applicable requirements of this chapter, including the requirements set forth in this subsection (9)(e), may be adopted by reference to satisfy these requirements, except that to the extent any of the substantive requirements of this subsection (9)(e) are not addressed, or are inadequately addressed, in the referenced natural hazard mitigation plan, a county or city must supplement the natural hazard mitigation plan accordingly so that the adopted resiliency subelement complies fully with the substantive requirements of this subsection (9)(e).(A) If a county or city intends to adopt by reference a federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan in order to meet all or part of the substantive requirements set forth in this subsection (9)(e), and the most recently adopted federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan does not comply with the requirements of this subsection (9)(e), the department may grant the county or city an extension of time in which to submit a natural hazard mitigation plan.(B) Eligibility for an extension under this subsection prior to July 1, 2027, is limited to a city or county required to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive plan on or before June 30, 2025, as provided in RCW 36.70A.130, or for a city or county with an existing, unexpired federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan scheduled to expire before December 31, 2024.(C) Extension requests after July 1, 2027, may be granted if requirements for the resiliency subelement are amended or added by the legislature or if the department finds other circumstances that may result in a potential finding of noncompliance with a jurisdiction's existing and approved federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan.(D) A city or county that wishes to request an extension of time must submit a request in writing to the department no later than the date on which the city or county is required to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive plan as provided in RCW 36.70A.130.(E) Upon the submission of such a request to the department, the city or county may have an additional 48 months from the date provided in RCW 36.70A.130 in which to either adopt by reference an updated federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan or adopt its own natural hazard mitigation plan, and to then submit that plan to the department.(F) The adoption of ordinances, amendments to comprehensive plans, amendments to development regulations, and other nonproject actions taken by a county or city pursuant to (d) of this subsection in order to implement measures specified by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120 are not subject to administrative or judicial appeal under chapter 43.21C RCW.(10) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and distributed by the state at least two years before local government must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.130 and 2025 c 269 s 5 and 2025 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.(b)(i) A city or town located within a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may opt out of a full review and revisions of its comprehensive plan established in this section if the city or town meets the following criteria:(A) Has a population fewer than 500;(B) Is not located within 10 miles of a city with a population over 100,000;(C) Experienced a population growth rate of fewer than 10 percent in the preceding 10 years; and(D) Has provided the department with notice of its intent to participate in a partial review and revision of its comprehensive plan.(ii) The department shall review the population growth rate for a city or town participating in the partial review and revision of its comprehensive plan process at least three years before the periodic update is due as outlined in subsection (4) of this section and notify cities of their eligibility.(iii) A city or town that opts out of a full review and revision of its comprehensive plan must update its critical areas regulations and its capital facilities element and its transportation element.(c) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and the reasons therefor.(d) The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population allocated to a city or county from the most recent 10-year population forecast by the office of financial management.(e) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan.(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW 36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise, if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or in accordance with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section. Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under the following circumstances:(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan. Subarea plans adopted under this subsection (2)(a)(i) must clarify, supplement, or implement jurisdiction-wide comprehensive plan policies, and may only be adopted if the cumulative impacts of the proposed plan are addressed by appropriate environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;(ii) The development of an initial subarea plan for economic development located outside of the 100 year floodplain in a county that has completed a state-funded pilot project that is based on watershed characterization and local habitat assessment;(iii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;(iv) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget;(v) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.440, provided that amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a) and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to comment; or(vi) The adoption or amendment of any housing element necessary to receive a determination of compliance under RCW 36.70A.835.(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with the growth management hearings board or with the court.(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, according to the schedules established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, its designated urban growth area or areas, patterns of development occurring within the urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas.(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding 20-year period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.(c) If, during the county's review under (a) of this subsection, the county determines revision of the urban growth area is not required to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding 20-year period, but does determine that patterns of development have created pressure in areas that exceed available, developable lands within the urban growth area, the urban growth area or areas may be revised to accommodate identified patterns of development and likely future development pressure for the succeeding 20-year period if the following requirements are met:(i) The revised urban growth area may not result in an increase in the total surface areas of the urban growth area or areas;(ii) The areas added to the urban growth area are not or have not been designated as agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands of long-term commercial significance;(iii) Less than 15 percent of the areas added to the urban growth area are critical areas;(iv) The areas added to the urban growth areas are suitable for urban growth;(v) The transportation element and capital facility plan element have identified the transportation facilities, and public facilities and services needed to serve the urban growth area and the funding to provide the transportation facilities and public facilities and services;(vi) The urban growth area is not larger than needed to accommodate the growth planned for the succeeding 20-year planning period and a reasonable land market supply factor;(vii) The areas removed from the urban growth area do not include urban growth or urban densities; and(viii) The revised urban growth area is contiguous, does not include holes or gaps, and will not increase pressures to urbanize rural or natural resource lands.(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this section, counties and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:(a) On or before June 30, 2015, for King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those counties;(b) On or before June 30, 2016, for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Kitsap, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;(c) On or before June 30, 2017, for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Kittitas, Lewis, Skamania, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and(d) On or before June 30, 2018, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities within those counties.(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this section, following the review of comprehensive plans and development regulations required by subsection (4) of this section, counties and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, on or before December 31, 2024, with the following review and, if needed, revision on or before June 30, 2034, and then every 10 years thereafter, for King, Kitsap, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those counties;(b) On or before December 31, 2025, with the following review and, if needed, revision on or before June 30, 2035, and then every 10 years thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;(c) On or before December 31, 2026, with the following review and, if needed, revision, on or before June 30, 2036, and every 10 years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Franklin, Kittitas, Skamania, Spokane, Walla Walla, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and(d) On or before June 30, 2027, and every 10 years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Garfield, Grant, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, and Whitman counties and the cities within those counties.(6)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before the deadlines established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they elect to do so.(b) A county that is subject to a deadline established in subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the 24 months following the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section: The county has a population of less than 50,000 and has had its population increase by no more than 17 percent in the 10 years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.(c) A city that is subject to a deadline established in subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the 24 months following the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section: The city has a population of no more than 5,000 and has had its population increase by the greater of either no more than 100 persons or no more than 17 percent in the 10 years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.(d) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances, comprehensive plans, and development regulations.(7)(a) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities that meet the following criteria may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70A.135 RCW:(i) The county or city is in compliance with the deadlines in this section;(ii) The county or city demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section for development regulations that protect critical areas. For the purposes of this subsection (7)(a)(ii), a county or city that is fewer than 12 months out of compliance with the deadlines in this section for development regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section; or(iii) The county or city demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section for any housing element and any housing development regulations required to be submitted to the department for review under RCW 36.70A.835. For the purposes of this subsection (7)(a)(iii), a county or city that applies to the department for review within the timelines specified under RCW 36.70A.835 demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section and is eligible for grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70A.135 RCW until the department or the growth management hearings board issues a final decision determining that the county's or city's housing element or any related housing development regulations are not in compliance with the laws and regulations identified in RCW 36.70A.835(7).(b) Only those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, if a participating watershed is achieving benchmarks and goals for the protection of critical areas functions and values, the county is not required to update development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in that watershed.(b) A county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) may only adopt or amend development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a participating watershed if:(i) A work plan has been approved for that watershed in accordance with RCW 36.70A.725;(ii) The local watershed group for that watershed has requested the county to adopt or amend development regulations as part of a work plan developed under RCW 36.70A.720;(iii) The adoption or amendment of the development regulations is necessary to enable the county to respond to an order of the growth management hearings board or court;(iv) The adoption or amendment of development regulations is necessary to address a threat to human health or safety; or(v) Three or more years have elapsed since the receipt of funding.(c) Beginning 10 years from the date of receipt of funding, a county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) must review and, if necessary, revise development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a participating watershed in accordance with the review and revision requirements and timeline in subsection (5) of this section. This subsection (8)(c) does not apply to a participating watershed that has determined under RCW 36.70A.720(2)(c)(ii) that the watershed's goals and benchmarks for protection have been met.(9)(a) Counties subject to planning deadlines established in subsection (5) of this section that are required or that choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and that meet either criteria of (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, and cities with a population of more than 6,000 as of April 1, 2021, within those counties, must provide to the department an implementation progress report detailing the progress they have achieved in implementing their comprehensive plan five years after the review and revision of their comprehensive plan. Once a county meets the criteria in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, the implementation progress report requirements remain in effect thereafter for that county and the cities therein with populations greater than 6,000 as of April 1, 2021, even if the county later no longer meets either or both criteria. A county is subject to the implementation progress report requirement if it meets either of the following criteria on or after April 1, 2021:(i) The county has a population density of at least 100 people per square mile and a population of at least 200,000; or(ii) The county has a population density of at least 75 people per square mile and an annual growth rate of at least 1.75 percent as determined by the office of financial management.(b) The department shall adopt guidelines for indicators, measures, milestones, and criteria for use by counties and cities in the implementation progress report that must cover:(i) The implementation of previously adopted changes to the housing element and any effect those changes have had on housing affordability and availability within the jurisdiction;(ii) Permit processing timelines; and(iii) Progress toward implementing any actions required to achieve reductions to meet greenhouse gas and vehicle miles traveled requirements as provided for in any element of the comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.070.(c) If a city or county required to provide an implementation progress report under this subsection (9) has not implemented any specifically identified regulations, zoning and land use changes, or taken other legislative or administrative action necessary to implement any changes in the most recent periodic update in their comprehensive plan by the due date for the implementation progress report, the city or county must identify the need for such action in the implementation progress report. Cities and counties must adopt a work plan to implement any necessary regulations, zoning and land use changes, or take other legislative or administrative action identified in the implementation progress report and complete all work necessary for implementation within two years of submission of the implementation progress report.(10) Any county or city that is required by RCW 36.70A.095 to include in its comprehensive plan a climate change and resiliency element and that is also required by subsection (5)(a) of this section to review and, if necessary, revise its comprehensive plan on or before December 31, 2024, must update its transportation element and incorporate a climate change and resiliency element into its comprehensive plan as part of the first implementation progress report required by subsection (9) of this section if funds are appropriated and distributed by December 31, 2027, as required under RCW 36.70A.070(10).(11) In addition to comprehensive plans and development regulations, counties and cities shall periodically review and, if necessary, revise street standards, frontage improvement requirements, and related public works design standards to ensure consistency with current land use patterns, housing needs, and growth management goals. Such review should occur on a schedule aligned with the periodic review of comprehensive plans under subsection (5) of this section.--- END ---